Utah statutes.
23-13-19.   Administering substances to protected wildlife prohibited --
Exceptions.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Administer" means the application of a substance by any method,
including:
(i)  injection;
(ii)  inhalation;
(iii)  ingestion; or
(iv)  absorption.
(b)  "Agricultural producer" means a person who produces an agricultural
product.
(c)  "Agricultural product" is as defined in Section 4-1-8.
(d)  "Substance" means a chemical or organic substance that:
(i)  pacifies;
(ii)  sedates;
(iii)  immobilizes;
(iv)  harms;
(v)  kills;
(vi)  controls fertility; or
(vii)  has an effect that is similar to an effect listed in Subsections
(1)(d)(i) through (vi).
(2)  Except as authorized by Subsection (3) or a rule made by the Wildlife
Board, a person may not administer or attempt to administer a substance to
protected wildlife.
(3) (a)  A division employee or a person with written permission from the
division may administer a substance to protected wildlife if that employee or
person administers the substance to promote wildlife management and
conservation.
(b)  One or more of the following may administer a substance to protected
wildlife that the person is authorized by this title, the Wildlife Board, or
the division to possess:
(i)  a licensed veterinarian;
(ii)  an unlicensed assistive personnel, as defined in Section 58-28-102; or
(iii)  a person who is following written instructions for veterinary care from
a licensed veterinarian.
(4)  A person is not liable under this section for administering a substance,
notwithstanding the substance has an effect described in Subsection (1)(d) on
protected wildlife, if:
(a)  an agricultural producer administers the substance:
(i)  for the sole purpose of producing an agricultural product and not for the
purpose of affecting protected wildlife in a manner described in Subsection
(1)(d);
(ii)  consistent with generally accepted agricultural practices; and
(iii)  in compliance with applicable local, state, and federal law; or
(b)  the protected wildlife presents an immediate threat of death or serious
bodily injury to a person.
